apertium-ain.ain.lexd
! house:house NounInfl-Common ; ! A noun
エ:エ NounInfl-Common ; ! a noun
チ:チ NounInfl-Common ; !
エチ:エチ NounInfl-Common ; !
ク:ク NounInfl-Common ; !
イセ:イセ NounInfl-Common ; !
ポンペ:ポンペ NounInfl-Common ; !
チカㇷ゚:チカㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; !
オッカィ:オッカィ NounInfl-Common ; !
チイカナィ:チイカナィ NounInfl-Common ; !
チㇱナィ:チㇱナィ NounInfl-Common ; !
ト゚カラ:ト゚カラ NounInfl-Common ; !
イキリ:イキリ NounInfl-Common ; ! a seam 
アット゚ㇱ:アット゚ㇱ NounInfl-Common ; ! cloth 
シセイ:シセイ NounInfl-Common ; ! a house
チセ:チセ NounInfl-Common ; ! house
ハウ:ハウ NounInfl-Common ; ! the voice
ホニ:ホニ NounInfl-Common ; ! the stomach
カヤ:カヤ NounInfl-Common ; ! a sail
アイアイ:アイアイ NounInfl-utara ; !
アイヌ:アイヌ NounInfl-utara ; ! human/the Ainu
アシキペㇳ:アシキペㇳ NounInfl-U ; !
アㇳ:ア%{Tt%} NounInfl-U ; !
アㇺ:ア%{Mm%} NounInfl-U ; !
イクㇱペ:%{i%}クㇱペ NounInfl-preU ; !
イタㇰ:イタ%{Kk%} NounInfl-U ; !
イリワㇰ:イリワㇰ NounInfl-preU ; !
ウㇺマ:ウㇺマ NounInfl-utara ; !
クㇳ:ク%{t%} NounInfl-U ; !
ケマ:ケマ NounInfl-preU ; !
チェㇷ゚:チェㇷ゚ NounInfl-Nu ; !
ニシ:ニシ NounInfl-U ; !
ニマキ:ニマキ NounInfl-preU ; !
フラ:フラ NounInfl-Nu ; !
ペ:ペ%{pe%} NounInfl-Irreg ; !
ペㇳ:ペㇳ NounInfl-Irreg ; !
チコイキㇷ゚:チコイキㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; !
チセイ:チセイ NounInfl-Common ; !
シウェンテㇷ゚:シウェンテㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; !
クル:クル NounInfl-Common ; !
チェㇷ゚:チェㇷ゚ NounInfl-Nu ; !
クッペ:クッペ NounInfl-preU ; !
セタ:セタ NounInfl-Common ; !
アアㇰ:アアㇰ NounInfl-Common ; 
アトノ:アトノ NounInfl-Common ; 
アニㇱ:アニㇱ NounInfl-Common ; 
アポホ:アポホ NounInfl-Common ; 
アミチ:アミチ NounInfl-Common ; 
アユポ:アユポ NounInfl-Common ; 
アㇰ:アㇰ NounInfl-Common ; 
ト゚レㇱ:ト゚レㇱ NounInfl-Common ; 
シㇰ:シㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! eye
シキ:シキ NounInfl-Common ; ! eye TODO: Fix possessive noun (see above entry)
カムィ:カムィ NounInfl-Common ;
パ:パ NounInfl-Common ;
サㇺ:サㇺ NounInfl-Relational ;
ル:ル NounInfl-Common ;
ニㇱパ:ニㇱパ NounInfl-Common ;
ポネ:ポネ NounInfl-Common ; ! bone
シタ:シタ NounInfl-Common ; ! dog
ウパㇱ:ウパㇱ NounInfl-Common ; ! snow
イㇽ:イㇽ NounInfl-Common ; ! family/kin
フチ:フチ NounInfl-Common ; ! grandmother/old woman
フㇺイ:フㇺイ NounInfl-Common ; ! sound (possessive)
アペ:アペ NounInfl-Common ; ! fire
ワッカ:ワッカ NounInfl-Common ; ! water
ケㇺ:ケㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! blood
アト゚ィ:アト゚ィ NounInfl-Common ; ! sea/ocean
アマㇺ:アマㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! meal (lit. rice/cereals)
アㇷ゚ト:アㇷ゚ト NounInfl-Common ; ! rain
マチヤ:マチヤ NounInfl-Common ; ! town
ヌㇷ゚:ヌㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! field
オㇱケ:オㇱケ NounInfl-Common ; ! inside (noun locative)
ヌプリ:ヌプリ NounInfl-Common ; ! mountain
モンラィケ:モンラィケ NounInfl-Common ; ! work
ケラ:ケラ NounInfl-Common ; ! taste
パロ:パロ NounInfl-Common ; ! mouth (possessive)
イタピルㇷ゚:イタピルㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! cloth
カヤ:カヤ NounInfl-Common ; ! sail
チュㇰ:チュㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! autumn
クㇽ:クㇽ NounInfl-Common ; ! person
ポト゚ㇽケㇱ:ポト゚ㇽケㇱ NounInfl-Common ; ! bruise
オヤシㇺ:オヤシㇺ  NounInfl-Common ; ! day after tomorrow
オヤシㇺシㇺケ:オヤシㇺシㇺケ  NounInfl-Common ; ! 2 days after tomorrow
ケマ:ケマ NounInfl-Common ; ! leg
サパ:サパ NounInfl-Common ; ! head
シケ:シケ NounInfl-Common ; ! luggage
プィ:プィ NounInfl-Common ; ! hole
スㇺ:スㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! oil
イト゚ンナㇷ゚:イト゚ンナㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! ant
カィテ:カィテ NounInfl-Common ; ! anchor
サポ:サポ NounInfl-Common ; ! older sister
チㇷ゚:チㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! ship
ト゚ィ:ト゚ィ NounInfl-Common ; ! stomach
チュㇷ゚:チュㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! sun/moon/month
ニペㇰ:ニペㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! light (moon)
!ムン:ムン NounInfl-Common ; ! grass NEW
ラㇳチャコ:ラㇳチャコ NounInfl-Common ; ! light
アィアィ:アィアィ NounInfl-Common ; ! baby
タペト:タペト NounInfl-Common ; ! businessman
ノㇳキリ:ノㇳキリ NounInfl-Common ; ! chin
トゥカㇽ:トゥカㇽ NounInfl-Common ; ! seal
ポト゚ㇽケス:ポト゚ㇽケス NounInfl-Common ; ! bruise
ケマ:ケマ NounInfl-Common ; ! leg
チキㇼ:チキㇼ NounInfl-Common ; ! animal's leg
ルウェ:ルウェ NounInfl-Common ; ! trace/footprint
トコㇺポネ:トコㇺポネ NounInfl-Common ; ! ankle
ウルペㇳ:ウルペㇳ NounInfl-Common ; ! toe
アントゥキ:アントゥキ NounInfl-Common ; ! red bean
ポッペ:ポッペ NounInfl-Common ; ! sweat
サパ:サパ NounInfl-Common ; ! head
プィ:プィ NounInfl-Common ; ! hole
ユピ:ユピ NounInfl-Common ; ! older brother
サポ:サポ NounInfl-Common ; ! older sister
シラゥ:シラゥ NounInfl-Common ; ! horsefly
スㇺ:スㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! oil
フィペ:フィペ NounInfl-Common ; ! grease/fat
アマㇺ:アマㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! rice
イチェン:イチェン NounInfl-Common ; ! money
ヤ:ヤ NounInfl-Common ; ! net
クト゚:クト゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! fish trap
アㇷ゚ト:アㇷ゚ト NounInfl-Common ; ! rain
ト:ト NounInfl-Common ; ! day
ルヤㇺペ:ルヤㇺペ NounInfl-Common ; ! storm
ニㇲクㇽ:ニㇲクㇽ NounInfl-Common ; ! cloud
カゥカゥ:カゥカゥ NounInfl-Common ; ! hail
イト゚ンナㇷ゚:イト゚ンナㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! ant
カㇺピ:カㇺピ NounInfl-Common ; ! paper
ポㇷ゚:ポㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! blister
ウㇺマ:ウㇺマ NounInfl-Common ; ! horse
ムンチロ:ムンチロ NounInfl-Common ; ! millet
アィペ:アィペ NounInfl-Common ; ! abalone
オッカイポ:オッカイポ NounInfl-Common ; ! boy
メノコ:メノコ NounInfl-Common ; ! woman
ニテㇲ:ニテㇲ NounInfl-Common ; ! raft
カィテ:カィテ NounInfl-Common ; ! anchor
ト゚ㇲ:ト゚ㇲ NounInfl-Common ; ! net/rope
マウェ:マウェ NounInfl-Common ; ! breath
ト゚ミ:ト゚ミ NounInfl-Common ; ! war
トパット゚ミ:トパット゚ミ NounInfl-Common ; ! burglary
ヘㇺパㇰ:ヘㇺパㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! how many
スィ:スィ NounInfl-Common ; ! times
メㇺ:メㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! pond
スマ:スマ NounInfl-Common ; ! stone
ルィ:ルィ NounInfl-Common ; ! grinding stone
スシルㇷ゚:スシルㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! pumice stone
エポタラ:エポタラ NounInfl-Common ; ! doctor
ナィ:ナィ NounInfl-Common ; ! stream
トペニ:トペニ NounInfl-Common ; ! maple tree
チュルㇷ゚:チュルㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! january
エマゥリ:エマゥリ NounInfl-Common ; ! strawberry
ヘㇺパラ:ヘㇺパラ NounInfl-Common ; ! when
トケィ:トケィ NounInfl-Common ; ! clock
アシㇰネ:アシㇰネ NounInfl-Common ; ! five
シㇺプィ:シㇺプィ NounInfl-Common ; ! well
オマキルㇲ:オマキルㇲ NounInfl-Common ; ! locust
イメル:イメル NounInfl-Common ; ! lightning
エㇽメタㇺプ:エㇽメタㇺプ NounInfl-Common ; ! wart
アユㇲニ:アユㇲニ NounInfl-Common ; ! korean raspberry
エモ:エモ NounInfl-Common ; ! potato
アパウㇲタ:アパウㇲタ NounInfl-Common ; ! doctor
タンヌ:タンヌ NounInfl-Common ; ! dolphin
イヨㇷ゚:イヨㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! container
ワッカ:ワッカ NounInfl-Common ; ! water
ポンチェㇷ゚:ポンチェㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! sardine
パサ:パサ NounInfl-Common ; ! carriage
カ:カ NounInfl-Common ; ! top
テㇲカㇽ:テㇲカㇽ NounInfl-Common ; ! errand
ペコ:ペコ NounInfl-Common ; ! cow
ニス:ニス NounInfl-Common ; ! mortar
ピリ:ピリ  NounInfl-Common ; ! vortex
シノㇳチャ:シノㇳチャ NounInfl-Common ; ! song
イㇼ:イㇼ NounInfl-Common ; ! kin
チェㇷ゚:チェㇷ゚  NounInfl-Common ; ! fish
ラㇺ:ラㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! scales
ミㇺ:ミㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! fish meat
ノカ:ノカ NounInfl-Common ; ! picture
イモㇰ:イモㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! bait
ニテㇰ:ニテㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! branch
ノコ:ノコ NounInfl-Common ; ! saw
ヌマト゚シ:ヌマト゚シ NounInfl-Common ; ! collar
アㇳコチ:アㇳコチ NounInfl-Common ; ! fishtail
ユㇰ:ユㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! deer
アピㇼ:アピㇼ NounInfl-Common ; ! deer tail
カㇻク:カㇽク NounInfl-Common ; ! nephew
ヤ:ヤ NounInfl-Common ; ! land/shore
ホㇿケゥ:ホㇿケゥ NounInfl-Common ; ! wolf
アワンキ:アワンキ NounInfl-Common ; ! fan
シㇼ:シㇼ NounInfl-Common ; ! appearance
セㇾマカセㇽマカ NounInfl-Common ; ! behind
トピㇱキ:トピㇱキ NounInfl-Common ; ! malaria
ウオサ:ウオサ NounInfl-Common ; ! weaving instrument
アチャ:アチャ NounInfl-Common ; ! uncle
パロ:パロ NounInfl-Common ; ! mouth
オハゥ:オハゥ NounInfl-Common ; ! soup
アキヒ:アキヒ NounInfl-Common ; ! younger brother
ウナㇻペ:ウナㇽペ NounInfl-Common ; ! aunt
クㇳ:クㇳ NounInfl-Common ; ! sash
ケㇲ:ケㇲ NounInfl-Common ; ! end
ホク:ホク NounInfl-Common ; ! husband
ト゚リ:ト゚リ NounInfl-Common ; ! pole
セィ:セィ NounInfl-Common ; ! shell
ネ:ネ NounInfl-Common ; ! what
マッカチ:マッカチ NounInfl-Common ; ! girl
ネン:ネン NounInfl-Common ; ! who
ネㇷ゚:ネㇷ゚ NounInfl-Common ; ! what
ムイェ:ムイェ NounInfl-Common ; ! sheaf
パㇻカ:パㇻカ NounInfl-Common ; ! shelf
オッケオッケ:オッケオッケ NounInfl-Common ; ! stick
ウォㇿ:ウォㇿ NounInfl-Common ; ! water (old)
ニ:ニ NounInfl-Common ; ! firewood
オㇿ:オㇿ NounInfl-Common ; ! noun locative
ウタㇻ:ウタㇻ NounInfl-Common ; ! kin
タスㇺ:タスㇺ NounInfl-Common ; ! sickness
オルㇱペ:オルㇱペ NounInfl-Common ; ! story
Eq%<n%>:Eq  # ; ! units
kg%<n%>:kg  # ; ! units
m2%<n%>:m2  # ; ! units
q%<n%>:q  # ; ! units
テ%<n%>%<nloc%>:テ  # ; ! here
モシㇼ:モシㇼ NounInfl-Common ; ! land
アパ:アパ NounInfl-Common ; ! door
エスペラント:エスペラント NounInfl-Common ; ! Esperanto
アイヌイタㇰ:アイヌイタㇰ NounInfl-Common ; ! Ainu Language
アイヌウタㇻ:アイヌウタㇻ NounInfl-Common ; ! Ainu People
アイヌタイム:アイヌタイム  NounInfl-Common ; ! Ainu Times

LEXICON Clitic

アナㇰ%<cli%>%<top%>:アナㇰ # ;
アナㇰネ%<cli%>%<top%>:アナㇰネ # ;
ヒケ%<cli%>%<nmlz%>:ヒケ  # ; ! with regards to X

LEXICON Pronoun

アオカィ%<n%>%<pn%>:アオカィ # ;

LEXICON VerbRoot
